lexc/adj/enhuadjing.lexc
! al only with these
LEXICON AddAdji
0:^+cMid§oeoebb§bb Tocase1i;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasei;

LEXICON AddAdjmelyi
0:^+cMid§oeoebbmely§bb Tocase1melyi;  !körkörösebbek nem körkörösebbök!
@U.ART.ABSENT@  Tocasemelyi;


Lexicon Tocasei
[stem]+Adj:0     Possi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Pluri;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fami;

Lexicon Tocase1i
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Famim;

Lexicon Tocasemelyi
[stem]+Adj:0     Possmelyi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Plurmelyi;
[stem]+Adj:0     Fammelyi;

Lexicon Tocase1melyi
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Possmelyim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Plurmelyim;
[stem]+Adj+Mid:0     Fammelyim;

LEXICON Possi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fami;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fami;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fami;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fami;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fami;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fami;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fami;

LEXICON Possim
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez3§nként    #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA§st§uue§l   #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^§k§or             #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE1§m   Fami;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE1§d   Fami;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^^§J§§AE1§   Fami;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE§nk   Fami;   ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE1§t§OEOE§k   Fami;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE1§k   Fami;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE§im   Fami;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE§id   Fami;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE§i   Fami;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE§ink   Fami;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE§it§OEOE2§k   Fami;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE§ik   Fami;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Famim;

LEXICON Pluri
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Geni;
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoe§k    Geni; 
                            Geni;
LEXICON Plurim
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez1§k    Geni;
                            Geni1;

LEXICON Fami
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Geni;
                       Geni;

LEXICON Famim
+Fam:^+cFam^ék         Geni;
                       Geni1;

LEXICON Geni
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casei;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casei;
                       Casei;
LEXICON Geni1
+Gens:^+cGens^é          Casei;
+Genpl:^+cGenpl^éi     Casei;
                       Casei1;
LEXICON Casei
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig

LEXICON Casei1
+Abl:^+cAbl^§t§§oooe§l      #;  ! tól, től
+Acc:^+cAcc^§oeoez2§t       #;  ! ot, et, öt, t
+Ade:^+cAde^§n§§AAA§l       #;  ! nál, nél
+All:^+cAll^§h§§oeoe§z      #;  ! hoz, hez, höz
+Cau:^+cCau^ért             #;  ! ért
+Dat:^+cDat^§n§§AA§k        #;  ! nak, nek
+Del:^+cDel^§r§§oooe§l      #;  ! ról, ről
+Ess:^+cEss^§uue§l          #;    ! ul, ül
+Ela:^+cEla^§b§§oooe§l      #;  ! ból, ből
+Fac:^+cFac^§VV§§AAA§       #;  ! vá, vé
+Forp:^+ccForp^§k§épp          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Forpen:^+cxForpen^§k§éppen          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+For:^+cFor^§k§ént          #;  ! ként, képp, képpen
+Ill:^+cIll^§b§§AA§         #;  ! ból, ből
+Ine:^+cIne^§b§§AA§n        #;  ! ban, ben
+Ins:^+cIns^§VV§§AA§l       #;  ! val, vel
+Nom:^+cNom^0               #;  ! 
+Sub:^+cSub^§r§§AA§         #;  ! ra, re
+Sup:^+cSup^§oeoez§n        #;  ! on, en, ön, n
+Ter:^+cTer^ig              #;  ! ig
                           Ik;

LEXICON Possmelyim
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammelyi;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammelyi;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammelyi;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammelyi;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammelyi;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammelyi;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelyi;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelyi;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammelyi;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammelyi;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammelyi;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammelyi;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammelyi;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelyi;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammelyi;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammelyim;
LEXICON Possmelyi
+Dis:^+cDis^§ooez23§nként     #;    ! anként, enként
+Soc:^+cSoc^§EOA22§st§uue2§l  #;    ! astul, estül
+Tem:^+cTem^kor               #;    ! kor
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21§m   Fammelyi;   ! m
+Posss1s:^+cPosss1s^§OEOE21fazek§m   Fammelyi;   ! m
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21§d   Fammelyi;   ! d
+Posss2s:^+cPosss2s^§OEOE21fazek§d   Fammelyi;   ! d
+Posss3s:^+cPosss3s^§J§§AE21§   Fammelyi;   ! ja, je, a,e
+Possp1s:^+cPossp1s^§UUE2§nk   Fammelyi;    ! unk, ünk
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelyi;   ! etek, atok
+Possp2s:^+cPossp2s^§OEOE21fazek§t§OEOE25§k   Fammelyi;   ! etek, atok
+Possp3s:^+cPossp3s^§J§§UUE21§k   Fammelyi;   ! ük, uk
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JP§§AE22§im   Fammelyi;   ! aim
+Posss1p:^+cPosss1p^§JPJ§§AE22§im   Fammelyi;   ! aim
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JP§§AE22§id   Fammelyi;   ! aid
+Posss2p:^+cPosss2p^§JPJ§§AE22§id   Fammelyi;   ! aid
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JP§§AE22§i   Fammelyi;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Posss3p:^+cPosss3p^§JPJ§§AE22§i   Fammelyi;   ! ai, jai, ei, jei
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JP§§AE22§ink   Fammelyi;   ! aink, eink
+Possp1p:^+cPossp1p^§JPJ§§AE22§ink   Fammelyi;   ! aink, eink
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JP§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelyi;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp2p:^+cPossp2p^§JPJ§§AE22§it§OEOE22§k   Fammelyi;  ! aitok, eitek
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JP§§AE22§ik   Fammelyi;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
+Possp3p:^+cPossp3p^§JPJ§§AE22§ik   Fammelyi;   !aik, jaik, eik, jeik
                           Fammelyi;


LEXICON Plurmelyi
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoeadjoemely§k    Genmelyi; 
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmelyi;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmelyi;
                            Genmelyi;
LEXICON Plurmelyim
+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez21§k    Genmelyi;
!+Plur:^+cPlur^§oeoez17§k    Genmelyi;
                            Genmelyi1;
        

LEXICON Adj
arisztophanészi AddAdji;
arisztophanészi AddAdjmelyi;
athéni AddAdji;
athéni AddAdjmelyi;
bázeli AddAdji;
bázeli AddAdjmelyi;
haseki AddAdji;
haseki AddAdjmelyi;
lobacsevszkiji AddAdji;
lobacsevszkiji AddAdjmelyi;
mózesi AddAdji;
mózesi AddAdjmelyi;
ramszeszi AddAdji;
ramszeszi AddAdjmelyi;
schopenhaueri AddAdji;
schopenhaueri AddAdjmelyi;
schuberti AddAdji;
schuberti AddAdjmelyi;
szókratészi AddAdji;
szókratészi AddAdjmelyi;
